Up to this point, the concepts that you have covered have been ones that apply to the insurance industry as a whole. Now that you have examined insurance policies and their provisions, you can turn your attention to regulations and definitions that apply only to this state. You’ll learn about a variety of topics, from the duties of the Insurance Department to licensing laws. This chapter is full of definitions and numbers for time limits and dollar amounts. Make sure that you know them for your exam.

Terms to Know
Appointment — the authority given by an insurer to an agent to transact insurance or adjust claims on the insurer's behalf
Cease and desist — to stop or discontinue
Commission — payment to the agent by the insurance company for placing insurance, usually a percentage of the policy premium
Exempt — not subject to an obligation
Home office — insurer's headquarters, principal place of business
Inducement — an offer that attempts to influence the other party
Insolvent — unable to meet financial obligations
Reciprocity — a mutual interchange of rights and privileges
Statute — a formal written law enacted by legislature; insurance statutes can be found in the state Insurance Code
Subpoena — an order for someone to appear as a witness or submit testimony or evidence
Insurance Transactions and Insurers - Definitions
1. Transacting Insurance
The term insurance transaction includes any of the following (by mail or any other means):

Solicitation;
Negotiations;
Sale (effectuation of a contract of insurance); and
Advising an individual concerning coverage or claims.
Insurance Contract
An insurance contract is an agreement between a policyowner (often an insured) and an insurer, where the insurer agrees, for a consideration, to indemnify the insured for loss caused by specified events.

2. Insurers
The insurer (or principal) is the company or organization that issues a policy of insurance.

Insurance companies can be classified in a variety of ways based on ownership, authority to transact business, location of incorporation (domicile), marketing and distribution systems, or rating (financial strength).

As you read about different classifications of insurers, keep in mind that these categories are not mutually exclusive, and the same company can be described based on where it is located and allowed to transact the business of insurance, who owns it, and what type of agents it appoints.

Domestic, Foreign, and Alien
Insurance companies are classified according to the location of incorporation (domicile). Regardless of where an insurance company is incorporated, it must obtain a Certificate of Authority before transacting insurance within the state.

Know This
A domicile refers to the location where an insurer is incorporated, not necessarily where the insurer conducts business.
A domestic insurer is an insurance company that is incorporated in this state. In most cases, the company's home office is in the state in which it was formed — the company's domicile. For instance, a company chartered in Pennsylvania would be considered a Pennsylvania domestic company.

A foreign insurer is an insurance company that is incorporated in another state, the District of Columbia, or a territorial possession. The United States has 5 major U.S. territories: American Samoa, Guam, the Northern Mariana Islands, Puerto Rico, and the U.S. Virgin Islands.

For example, a company chartered in California would be a foreign insurer within the state of New York. A company chartered in Puerto Rico will be foreign in any U.S. state.

An alien insurer is an insurance company that is incorporated outside the United States.

Ownership
Stock companies are owned by the stockholders who provide the capital necessary to establish and operate the insurance company and who share in any profits or losses. Officers are elected by the stockholders and manage stock insurance companies. Traditionally, stock companies issue nonparticipating policies, in which policyowners do not share in profits or losses.

A nonparticipating (stock) policy does not pay dividends to policyowners; however, taxable dividends are paid to stockholders. The dividends are not guaranteed as they are based on company profit.

Mutual companies are owned by the policyowners and issue participating policies. With participating policies, policyowners are entitled to dividends, which, in the case of mutual companies, are a return of excess premiums and are, therefore, nontaxable. Dividends are generated when the premiums and the earnings combined exceed the actual costs of providing coverage, creating a surplus. Dividends are not guaranteed.

Authorized vs. Unauthorized Insurers, and Certificate of Authority
Before insurers may transact business in a specific state, they must apply for and be granted a license or Certificate of Authority from the state department of insurance and meet any financial (capital and surplus) requirements set by the state. Insurers who meet the state's financial requirements and are approved to transact business in the state are considered authorized or admitted into the state as a legal insurer. Those insurers who have not been approved to do business in the state are considered unauthorized or nonadmitted. Most states have laws that prohibit unauthorized insurers from conducting business in the state, except through licensed excess and surplus lines brokers.

Know This
Insurers must obtain a Certificate of Authority prior to transacting business in this state.

Financial Services Regulation
In 1998, Florida voters passed a constitutional amendment combining the offices of the State Treasurer, who oversees the Department of Insurance and also serves as the State Fire Marshall, and the Comptroller, who also serves as the head of the Department of Banking and Finances. Beginning January 7, 2003, the duties and responsibilities of both departments fall under the new Department of Financial Services (Department).

The Department consists of 15 divisions and offices. The following 5 divisions are involved in regulating insurance:

Division of Accounting and Auditing (Bureau of Unclaimed Property);
Division of Insurance Agents and Agency Services;
Division of Insurance Fraud;
Division of Consumer Services; and
Office of the Insurance Consumer Advocate.
1. Financial Services Commission
Within the Department of Financial Services, the Financial Services Commission is composed of the Governor, the Attorney General, the Chief Financial Officer, and the Commissioner of Agriculture. The Commission is afforded the flexibility to organize the offices in any manner deemed appropriate to promote both efficiency and accountability within the Department. The Commission appoints or removes Directors by a majority vote consisting of at least 3 affirmative votes, with both the Governor and the Chief Financial Officer on the prevailing side.

The major structural unit of the Commission is the office. The following 2 offices are established within the Commission: the Office of Financial Regulation and the Office of Insurance Regulation, which specifically regulates the business of insurance in the state.

The Office of Insurance Regulation is responsible for all activities concerning insurers, including licensing and certificates of authority, rates, policy forms, premium financing, claims, solvency, viatical settlements, administrative supervision, and any other related provisions of the Insurance Code. The Director or Commissioner of Insurance Regulation is the head of the Office of Insurance Regulation.

Three Deputy Commissioners serve under the Commissioner of the Office as follows:

Deputy Commissioner for business development and market research;
Deputy Commissioner for property and casualty; and
Deputy Commissioner for life and health and for specialty.
The Office of Financial Regulation is responsible for all activities of the Financial Services Commission relating to the regulation of banks, credit unions, finance companies, and the securities industry. The Director or Commissioner is also the head of this office, known as the Commissioner of Financial Regulation. The Office of Financial Regulation includes a Bureau of Financial Investigations that functions as a criminal justice agency, and conducts investigations within or outside the state as deemed necessary to aid in the enforcement of state laws. If, during an investigation, the Office has reason to believe that any criminal law of this state has or may have been violated, the Office may refer any records pertaining to the violation to state or federal law enforcement or prosecutorial agencies, and will provide investigative assistance to those agencies as required.

2. Chief Financial Officer
Insurance laws in Florida are administered by the Chief Financial Officer, the Financial Services Commission, and the Commissioner of the Office of Insurance Regulation. The Chief Financial Officer (CFO) is independently elected and serves as the head of the Department of Financial Services and as a member of the Financial Services Commission. The CFO oversees all 15 divisions and offices of the Department.

The CFO has the authority to issue subpoenas, administer oaths, and examine witnesses when examining and investigating any person implicated in an account, claim, or demand against or by the state. Related costs incurred by the CFO or the Department will be charged against the subpoenaed person, and failure to comply with such order will be a contempt of court.

C. Department of Financial Services

Department of Financial Services
The main purpose of the Department of Financial Services is to enforce the provisions of the Insurance Code, and to execute the duties imposed upon it by the Code. General powers and duties of the Department include the following:

Conduct investigations of insurance matters as deemed appropriate, in addition to those expressly authorized by the Insurance Code; the cost of these additional examinations will be borne by the state;
Collect, propose, publish, and disseminate information relating to its duties imposed by law;
Employ actuaries and be at-will employees serving at the pleasure of the Chief Financial Officer; and
Adopt rules to implement provisions of law conferring the Department's duties.
The Department is also responsible for agent and adjuster licensing and investigations. In the event that the Department finds that any person has violated any provision of the Insurance Code, they may issue a cease and desist order, and/or an administrative fine. The Department also has the authority to suspend or revoke the license or certificate of authority of the licensee in violation of the Insurance Code of this state. The Department may also hold hearings for any purpose within the scope of the Code.

1. Consumer Services
The Division of Consumer Services responds to complaints by consumers. This division is under direct supervision of the Chief Financial Officer.

2. Rehabilitation and Liquidation
The purpose of the Insurers Rehabilitation and Liquidation Act is to do the following:

Protect the interests of policyholders, creditors, and other claimants, and the public;
Provide a comprehensive scheme for administering insurer receiverships;
Detect any potentially dangerous condition in an insurer and promptly apply appropriate corrective measures;
Implement improved methods for rehabilitating insurers, which methods involve the cooperation and management expertise of the insurance industry;
Enhance the efficiency and economy of the liquidation process by clarifying the law to minimize legal uncertainty and litigation;
Establish a system to equitably apportion any unavoidable loss;
Administer insurer receiverships more efficiently on an interstate and international basis by facilitating cooperation between states and by extending the scope of personal jurisdiction over debtors of the insurer outside this state; and
Maximize recovery of assets for the benefit of the insurer's estate; policyholders, creditors, and other claimants; and the public.
Grounds for rehabilitation of insurers — The department may petition for an order directing it to rehabilitate a domestic insurer or an alien insurer domiciled in this state on any one or more of the following grounds, among others, that the insurer:

Is impaired or insolvent;
Has failed to comply with an order of the office to make good an impairment of capital, or surplus, or both;
Is found to be in a condition or is using methods or practices in the conduct of its business, that are hazardous to its policyholders, creditors, stockholders, or the public;
Has failed to submit any books, documents, accounts, records, and affairs pertaining to the insurer for the reasonable inspection or examination of the office;
Has concealed or removed records or assets;
Has transferred or attempted to transfer substantially its entire property or business, or has entered into any transaction the effect of which is to merge substantially its entire property or business into that of any other insurer or entity without having first obtained the written approval of the office;
Has willfully violated its charter or certificate of incorporation or any law of this state;
Is engaging in a systematic practice of reaching settlements with and obtaining releases from policyholders or third-party claimants and then unreasonably delaying payment of, or failing to pay, the agreed-upon settlements; or
Within the previous 12 months has systematically attempted to compromise with creditors on the ground that it is financially unable to pay its claims in full.
Grounds for liquidation — The department may apply to the court for an order to liquidate the business of a domestic insurer or of the United States branch of an alien insurer upon any of the following grounds, if such insurer:

Is or is about to become insolvent;
Is an insolvent insurer and has commenced or is attempting to commence voluntary liquidation or dissolution except as permitted under the Insurance Code; or
Has not completed its organization and obtained a certificate of authority as an insurer within the time allowed for it under any applicable law.
An order to rehabilitate a domestic insurer allows the department to take possession of the property of the insurer and to conduct the insurer's business, and to take steps toward removal of the causes and conditions which have made rehabilitation necessary as directed by the court. If at any time the department deems that further efforts to rehabilitate the insurer would be useless, it may apply to the court for an order of liquidation.

An order to liquidate the business of a domestic insurer allows the department to take immediate possession of the property of the insurer, to marshal all its assets, to liquidate its business, to deal with the insurer's property and business in its own name or in the name of the insurer, and to give notice to all creditors who may have claims against the insurer.

3. Insurer Anti-Fraud Plans
Insurers are required to file with the Division of Insurance Fraud anti-fraud plans that include a written description of the following:

The organizational arrangement of the insurer's anti-fraud personnel who are responsible for the investigation and reporting of possible fraudulent insurance acts;
The insurer's procedures for detecting and investigating possible fraudulent insurance acts;
The insurer's procedures for the mandatory reporting of possible fraudulent insurance acts to the Division;
The insurer's plan for anti-fraud education and training of its claims adjusters and any other personnel involved in anti-fraud related efforts;
The contact information, including names, e-mail addresses, and telephone numbers, for personnel designated by the insurer to be responsible for achieving and maintaining compliance;
The insurer's NAIC individual and group code numbers.
Insurers must submit this anti-fraud plan electronically via the Division's website at www.myfloridacfo.com, on the form authorized by the Department. The insurer's filing of the information required above constitutes an acceptable anti-fraud plan. 

D. Office of Insurance Regulation

Office of Insurance Regulation
The Chief Financial Officer, along with the Office of Insurance Regulation, are concerned with regulation of insurers and their agents. The major areas of regulation include the following:

Organizing and licensing of companies, including establishment of the initial financial requirements;
Policing against unauthorized insurance activities;
Continuing regulation of insurance company activities, including policy forms and provisions and rates (direct rate regulation is not applicable to life insurance);
Supervising the methods of obtaining business, including licensing of agents and control of unfair trade and advertising practices;
Monitoring the financial condition of insurers, including specifications of appropriate investment categories and appropriate methodology for developing liabilities; and
Rehabilitating or liquidating insurers where necessary.
1. Market Conduct Examinations and Investigation of Insurers
The CFO and the Office of Insurance Regulation have the right to examine the affairs of every person or entity authorized to transact insurance in this state. The purpose of the examination of insurers' books and records is to ensure that the companies remain solvent and conduct business of insurance in compliance with state laws and regulations pertaining to licensing, policy forms, rates, claims, and market conduct.

Examinations must be conducted at least once every 5 years, or as frequently as deemed appropriate by the Office. The cost of examinations is the responsibility of the insurance company being examined.

In lieu of an examination of foreign and alien insurers, the Office may accept an examination report from the accredited Departments of Insurance of their state of domicile.

If there is a reason to believe that any person has violated any provisions of the Insurance Code, or upon a written complaint, the Department will conduct an investigation as deemed necessary of the accounts, records, documents, and transactions pertaining to or affecting the insurance affairs of any agent, adjuster, customer or service representative, or any other person.

Any person who obstructs the Department, the Office, or the examiner in the authorized examinations or investigations is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction will be subject to a denial, suspension, or revocation of a license or certificate of authority, and other penalties as provided by the Insurance Code.

2. Cease and Desist Order
Because the Department's role is to enforce insurance laws and to protect the public from unfair trade practices, if the Department or Office suspects that an insurer or a licensee has committed a violation of any state insurance provision, statute, rule, or order, the Department or Office may issue a statement of charges and hold a hearing for any purpose deemed necessary (within the scope of the Insurance Code).

If no hearing is requested within the time allowed by the Insurance Code, or if a hearing is held and the Department or Office finds that any of the charges are proven, they may enter an order directing the licensee or the affiliated party named in the complaint to cease and desist from engaging in the misconduct.

Any person who violates a cease and desist order of the Department or Office will be subject to the following penalties:

A monetary penalty of up to $50,000;
Suspension or revocation of the person's license or certificate of authority; and/or
Any other relief as provided in the Insurance Code.
3. Agency Actions (Administrative Enforcement Guidelines)
In imposing any administrative action provided for in the financial institutions codes, the Office must take into account the appropriateness of the penalty with respect to the size of the financial resources and good faith of the person charged, the gravity of the violation, the history of previous violations, and any other matters as justice may require.

Any service required or authorized to be made by the Office under the financial institutions codes may be made by

Certified mail, return receipt requested, delivered to addressee only;
Personal delivery; or
Other means in accordance with the Code.
4. Policy Approvals, Rates and Forms
The purpose of rate regulation is to promote public welfare by regulating insurance rates in order to assure that they are not excessive, inadequate, or unfairly discriminatory, and to authorize and regulate cooperative action among insurers in rate-making.

The Florida Insurance Code requires insurers to file their premium rates with the Office of Insurance Regulation. Rate filings must be accompanied by supporting information used to establish a rate. The Office has the authority to supervise rate making.

The Office of Insurance Regulation has the authority to approve all policy forms. Prior to the use of any policy or contract form, application form, rider, or endorsement, insurers must submit the forms and all changes to the Office. All forms must be filed at least 30 days in advance of their use or delivery. At the end of the 30-day period, the forms are deemed approved unless disapproved by the Office.

E. Licensing

Licensing
1. Purpose
Insurance professionals must be properly licensed for a specific line of authority in order to transact insurance. The purpose of licensing is to ensure that a producer meets educational and ethical standards required to fulfill producer's responsibilities to the insurer and to the public. Licensing regulations set out the requirements, procedures, and fees relating to the qualification, licensure, and appointment of insurance producers.

No person may be, act as, or advertise or hold themselves out to be an insurance agent or customer representative unless the person is currently licensed by the Department and appointed by one or more insurers.

2. License Types
Agent
An insurance agent is a person authorized by an insurer, fraternal benefit society or health maintenance organization to solicit, negotiate and obtain insurance or annuity contracts. The agent represents the insurer, not the insured.

Agency
Any business entity, such as a firm, corporation, association, partnership, or other legal entity, must obtain an insurance agency license prior to transacting insurance or acting in its own name as an insurance agency. The application for an insurance agency license must be signed by the owner(s) of the agency, and include the following information:

The name of each majority owner, partner, officer, and director;
The residence address of each person required to be listed on the application;
The agency's name and its principal business address;
The location of each agency office and the name under which it conducts business;
The name of each agent to be in full-time charge of an agency office; and
The fingerprints of each of the following:
A sole proprietor;
Each individual required to be listed in the application; and
Each individual who directs or participates in the management or control of an incorporated agency whose shares are not traded on a securities exchange.
As long as an insurance agency has an "agent in charge," its license will continue in force until canceled, suspended, revoked, or otherwise terminated. An "agent in charge" is the licensed and appointed agent who is responsible for the supervision of all individuals within an insurance agency location, regardless of whether the agent in charge handles a specific transaction or deals with the general public in the solicitation or negotiation of insurance contracts or the collection or accounting of moneys. The agent in charge must hold the required licenses to transact at least 2 of the lines of insurance being handled at the location. If only one line of insurance is handled at the location, the agent in charge must hold the required agent license to transact that line of insurance.

Branch Locations
Each branch location established by an agent, agency, firm, corporation, or association must be in the active full-time charge of a licensed general lines, or life and/or health agent who is appointed to represent one or more insurers. The agent in charge of an insurance agency may also be the agent in charge of additional branch office locations of the agency, provided its activities do not occur when the agent is not physically present.

3. License Requirements
Qualifications, Application, and Examination
The Department will not grant or issue an agent's license to anyone who is untrustworthy or incompetent, or who does not meet the following qualifications:

Is a natural person of at least 18 years of age;
Is a U.S. citizen or legal alien authorized to work in this state;
Is a resident of Florida (if applying for a resident's license);
If an applicant holds a resident license in another state, the applicant must furnish a letter of clearance satisfactory to the Department that the resident licenses have been canceled or changed to a nonresident status, and that the licensee is in good standing;
Is not an employee of the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs or state service office;
Is not a funeral director or direct disposer, and has no office connected with a funeral establishment, except that a funeral establishment may contract with a life insurance agent to sell a preneed contract. An insurance agent may sell limited policies of insurance covering the expense of final disposition or burial of an insured in an amount no more than $21,000;
Has completed the required prelicensing education and passed an examination for each license (note that applicants may not take the same licensing examination more than 5 times in a 12-month period); and
Has paid the required fees.
A licensed agent in good standing in another state may apply to the Department to have the license transferred to this state to obtain a resident agent license for the same line of authority. The agent must also meet the following requirements:

Become a resident of this state;
Been licensed in another state for a minimum of 1 year immediately preceding the application with Florida's Insurance Department;
Submit an application, which must be received within 90 days after becoming a resident;
Submit a certificate from the home state identifying the type of license and lines of authority and stating that the applicant was in good standing;
Submit a set of fingerprints;
Satisfy the prelicensing education requirements in Florida unless the prelicensing requirements in the previous state are substantially equivalent to Florida's; and
Satisfy the examination requirement unless exempt.
An applicant for a license must be qualified as to knowledge, experience, or instruction in the business of insurance. This includes the following:

Successful completion of a prelicensing education course in insurance approved by the Department (30 hours for a Life license, 40 hours for a Health license, 60 hours for a combination Life & Health license, 200 hours for General Lines — Property and Casualty, and 60 hours for Personal Lines);
Holding an active license in life, or life and health, insurance in another state. This provision may not be utilized unless the other state grants reciprocal treatment to licensees formerly licensed in Florida; or
Employment by the Department for at least 1 year, full time in life or life and health insurance regulatory matters, and not being terminated by the Department. Application for examination must be made within 4 years after employment ends.
Any person in the military who obtains a license and appointment as a life agent must maintain records, claims, and information facilities at a location accessible to the public that is not located on any military installation. Agents are not allowed to sell insurance policies, contracts, or certificates to any active duty military person or their families if the buyer or proposed insured is of a lower rank or pay grade.

An applicant for a life agent's license may obtain a temporary license for a maximum period of 6 months. If, during the 6-month temporary license period, the applicant passes the license examination, the temporary license and appointment will terminate, and a license will be issued after payment of a modification fee. Only one temporary license may be issued to an applicant. Application for the temporary license must be made on the forms prescribed and furnished by the Florida Department of Insurance.

The Department may issue a nonresident agent license to an individual who is not resident of this state without requiring a written examination, as long as all other licensing requirements are met, and the individual's home state or province of Canada provides the same privileges to residents of Florida (reciprocity).

Exemption from Licensing
An insurance producer license is not required of any officer, director or employee of an insurer or organizations employed by insurers, provided they are not directly or indirectly involved with the actual sale of an insurance contract and do not receive any commission.

Furthermore, the following individuals are NOT required to hold an insurance producer license:

A director or employee of an insurer whose activities are limited to executive, administrative, managerial, or clerical;
The director or employee of a special agent assisting insurance producers by providing technical advice and assistance to licensed insurance producers;
A person who secures and furnishes information for group insurance or performs administrative services related to mass-marketed property and casualty insurance;
An employer or association engaged in the administration or operation of a program of employee benefits for the employer's or association's own employees;
Employees of insurers or organizations engaging in the inspection, rating or classification of risks, or in the supervision of the training of insurance producers and who are not individually engaged in the sale of insurance;
A person whose activities are limited to advertising without the intent to solicit insurance;
A nonresident who sells, solicits or negotiates a contract of insurance for commercial property and casualty risks to an insured with risks located in more than one state insured under that contract; or
A salaried full-time employee who counsels or advises their employer relative to the insurance interests of the employer or subsidiaries.
Background Check
Applicants for a license as an agent, customer representative, adjuster, service representative, managing general agent, or reinsurance intermediary must submit a set of fingerprints to the Department. If the applicant is a business entity, a set of the fingerprints of the sole proprietor, majority owner, partners, officers, and directors will be required. The applicant will be responsible for the fingerprinting processing fee.

Fingerprints may be used to investigate the applicant's qualifications for licensing, and to conduct the applicant's criminal records background check.

4. Maintaining a License
An agent's license remains in effect unless revoked or suspended, and may be continually renewed as long as the agent pays required fees and meets continuing education requirements.

Continuing Education
Continuing education (CE) rules are established to protect the public by maintaining high standards of professional competence in the insurance industry, and to maintain and improve the insurance skills and knowledge of licensed producers.

In Florida, agents licensed for less than 6 years must complete a minimum of 24 hours of continuing education every 2 years in courses approved by the Department. Out of the 24 hours, agents are required to complete a 4-hour Law and Ethics update course that covers insurance law updates, ethics, disciplinary trends and case studies, product suitability, and other insurance related topics required by the Department.

Agents who have been licensed for a period of 6 or more years must complete 20 CE hours every 2 years, including a 4-hour Law and Ethics update course.

A licensee who has been licensed for 25 years or more, and holds a CLU or a CPCU designation, or an undergraduate degree in risk management and insurance must complete a 4-hour Law and Ethics update course and 6 hours of elective credits, for a total of 10 hours of CE every 2 years.

For good cause shown, the Department may grant an extension of time during which the continuing education requirements may be completed for up to 1 year.

Excess hours accumulated during any 2-year period may be carried forward to the next compliance period.

Nonresident CE requirements are as follows:

A nonresident producer who completes CE requirements in the home state may use the home state requirements to meet Florida's CE requirements, as well, if the resident's state recognizes reciprocity with Florida’s CE requirements.
A nonresident whose home state does not have a CE requirement but is licensed for the same class of business in another state which does have a CE requirement may comply with Florida’s CE requirements by furnishing proof of compliance with the other state's requirement if that state has a reciprocal agreement with Florida.
A nonresident whose home state does not have such CE requirements, and who is not licensed as a nonresident agent in a state that has CE requirements and reciprocates with Florida, must meet the Florida CE requirements.
Any part of the following courses may be completed to meet the CE course requirements:

The Life Underwriter Training Council's Course Curriculum	
24 hours (life)
12 hours (health)
The American College CLU diploma curriculum	
24 hours
The Insurance Institute of America's program in general insurance	
12 hours
The American Institute for Property and Liability Underwriters' Chartered Property Casualty Underwriter (CPCU) professional designation program	
24 hours
The Certified Insurance Counselor program	
21 hours
The Accredited Advisor in Insurance	
21 hours
For title agents, the Certified Land Closer (CLC) or Certified Land Searcher (CLS) professional designation program and designation	
24 hours
The Claims and Litigation Management Alliance (CLM) Universal Claims Certification (UCC) professional designation	
24 hours (elective CE)
4 hours (line-specific CE)
Any insurance-related course which is approved by the Department and taught by an accredited college or university per credit hour granted	
12 hours
Any course, including courses relating to agency management or errors and omissions approved by the Department, qualifies for the equivalency of the number of classroom hours assigned by the Department. However, unless otherwise provided by the statutes, CE hours may only be credited if the course is provided by classroom instruction or results in a monitored examination.
Each person or entity sponsoring a course for CE credit must furnish, within 21 days after completion of the course, a written and certified roster showing the name and license number of all persons successfully completing each course and requesting credit, accompanied by the required fee.

To renew or reinstate a license, a licensee must meet the continuing education  requirements. The Department may not issue a new appointment of the same or similar type to a licensee who was denied a renewal appointment for failing to complete continuing education as required.

Communicating with the Department
Every licensee must notify the Department in writing within 30 days after a change of name, residence address, principal business street address, telephone numbers (including a business number), or mailing or e-mail address. Any licensed agent who has moved their residence from Florida must have their license and all appointments immediately terminated by the Department. If the Department is not notified within the required time period, a maximum fine of $250 will be imposed for the first offense. For subsequent offenses, the agent will be subject to a minimum fine of $500 or license suspension or revocation.

Criminal and Administrative Actions
Agents must notify the Department of Financial Services in writing within 30 days after being found guilty of, or pleaded guilty or nolo contendere (no contest) to a felony or a crime punishable by imprisonment of 1 year or more in this or any other state.

An insurance producer must report to the Director any administrative action taken against the producer in another jurisdiction or by another governmental agency in this state within 30 days of the final disposition of the matter. This report must include a copy of the order, consent order or other relevant legal documents.

Suspension, Termination, Revocation of License
A licensee may have their license suspended, terminated, or revoked if the following are found:

Lack of one or more of the qualifications for the license or appointment;
Material misstatement, misrepresentation, or fraud in obtaining the license or appointment;
Failure to pass any required examination;
The license or appointment is willfully used to circumvent any requirements or prohibitions of the Insurance Code;
Willful misrepresentation of any insurance policy or annuity contract;
If, as an adjuster or agent licensed and appointed to adjust claims under the Code, a person has materially misrepresented the terms and coverages of an insurance contract with intent and for the purpose of effecting settlement of claim for loss or damage on less favorable terms than those provided in the contract;
Demonstrating lack of fitness or trustworthiness to engage in the business of insurance;
Demonstrating lack of reasonably adequate knowledge and technical competence to engage in insurance transactions;
Fraudulent or dishonest practices while conducting business;
Misappropriation, conversion, or unlawful withholding of funds received while conducting business;
Unlawfully rebating or offering to divide commission with another person;
Obtaining a license for the purpose of soliciting or handling controlled business;
Willful failure to comply with, or willful violation of, any proper order or rule of the department or willful violation of any provision of the Insurance Code;
Having been found guilty of or having pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to a misdemeanor directly related to the financial services business, any felony, or any crime punishable by imprisonment of 1 year or more under the law of the United States of America or of any state or any other country, without regard to whether a judgment of conviction has been entered by the court having jurisdiction of such cases;
Fraudulent or dishonest practice in submitting applications for workers compensation coverage;
Sale of an unregistered security that was required to be registered;
In transactions related to viatical settlement contracts, committing a fraudulent or dishonest act, no longer meeting the requirements for initial licensure, or receiving consideration for services with respect to viatical settlements that involved unlicensed providers.
5. Appointments
An insurance agent or producer cannot legally act as an agent of an insurer unless they become an appointed agent of that insurer. An insurance producer who does not act as an agent of an authorized insurer does not need to become appointed.

Each insurer appointing an agent, adjuster, service representative, customer representative, or managing general agent in Florida must file all appointments with the Department and, at the same time, pay the applicable appointment fee and taxes.

As a part of each appointment, there is a certified statement made by an officer of the entity appointing the person, which states what investigation is being made concerning the person that is being appointed. This includes the background of the person, as well as the officer's judgment of the person's moral character, fitness, and reputation. The statement also includes any other information that the department requires.

The insurer will also certify that it is willing to be bound by the acts of the agent, adjuster, service representative, customer representative, or managing general agent, within the scope of employment.

All appointments will be submitted to the Department on a monthly basis no later than 45 days after the date of appointment. All appointments will be effective as of the date requested on the appointment form.

An individual who fails to maintain an appointment with an appointing entity writing the class of business listed on their license during any 48-month period will not be granted an appointment for that class of insurance until the individual qualifies as a first-time applicant. When a licensee's last appointment for a particular class of insurance has been terminated or not renewed, the Department must notify the licensee that the licensee's eligibility for appointment will expire, unless the agent is appointed prior to expiration during the stated 48-month period.

Number of Appointments Permitted
At any one time, an agent may hold any or all categories of appointments for which the agent is qualified and licensed. However, an agent must have a separate appointment for each insurer.

Payment of Fees
Appointment fees are nonrefundable. However, if the applicant submits a written request within 60 days after the denial or disapproval of an appointment, the department will refund any state or county taxes received in connection with the application for the appointment.



Renewal, Continuation, Termination and Transferability of Appointment
Agent’s appointments remain in force until suspended, revoked or otherwise terminated; they are subject to a renewal if a request is filed by the appointing entity in the appointee’s birth month, and every 2 years after that, and all appropriate fees and taxes are paid. An appointing entity may terminate an agent’s appointment at any time, subject to an appointee’s contract rights and with a 60 days' advance notice. Once the appointment is terminated, the appointing entity must file a written notice with the department of insurance within 30 days.

Any issued appointment is valid only for the person named and is not transferable to another person.

Excess or Rejected Risks
Occasionally, a licensed life agent may place excess or rejected risks within the agent's licensing authority with another insurer without being required to have an appointment with that insurer. That would only be allowed if the agent's own insurer rejects the risk for underwriting reasons or can only accept it on a substandard basis, but another authorized insurer will be able to accept it at a lower rate; or if the portion of a risk is above the limits which the agent's own insurer will accept (excess).

Unaffiliated Insurance Agents
An unaffiliated insurance agent means a licensed insurance agent, except a limited lines agent, who is self-appointed and who practices as an independent consultant in the business of analyzing insurance policies, providing insurance advice or counseling, or making specific recommendations or comparisons of insurance products for a fee established in advance by written contract signed by the parties. An unaffiliated insurance agent may not be affiliated with an insurer, insurer-appointed insurance agent, or insurance agency contracted with or employing insurer-appointed insurance agents.

F. Agent Responsibilities

Agent Responsibilities
1. Fiduciary Capacity
Although the agents act for the insurer, they are legally obligated to treat applicants and insureds in an ethical manner. Because an agent handles the funds of the insured and the insurer, the agent has a fiduciary responsibility. A fiduciary is someone in a position of trust. More specifically, it is illegal for insurance producers to commingle premiums collected from the applicants with their own personal funds.

Premium Accountability
All premiums, return premiums, or other funds belonging to insurers or others received by an agent, insurance agency, customer representative, or adjuster in transactions under the license are trust funds received by the licensee in a fiduciary capacity.

Agents, agencies, customer representatives, or adjusters who either temporarily or permanently divert or misappropriate trust funds will the subject to the following penalties:

AMOUNT OF FUNDS

PENALTY

$300 or less	Misdemeanor of the 1st degree
More than $300 but less than $20,000	Felony of the 3rd degree
$20,000 or more but less than $100,000	Felony of the 2nd degree
$100,000 or more	Felony of the 1st degree
Separate Account Requirements
An agent must keep the funds belonging to each insurer for which an agent is not appointed in a separate account to allow the Department of Office to properly audit such funds. The licensee in the regular course of business must account for and pay the same to the insurer, insured, or other person entitled to the funds.

2. Commissions and Compensation or Charges for Extra Services
Insurers or licensed agents may only pay commissions to or share in commissions with other agents appointed and licensed to write the same kind of insurance. Licensees may share a commission with a corporation only if such corporation is an insurance agency.

Remember that the purpose of a license is to enable the licensee actively and in good faith to engage in the insurance business in the public interest, and not to enable them to receive a rebate of premium in the form of commission or other compensation based upon the insurance solicited.

In addition to other penalties provided by the statutes, the license of any licensee violating or participating in the violation of this regulation will be revoked.

This regulation does not prevent the payment or receipt of renewal or other deferred commissions or pensions because such person has ceased to hold a license or appointment to act as an insurance agent.

It is considered an illegal practice for an agent to knowingly collect any excess charges for insurance (any sum collected as a premium or charge that is not provided for or due on the insurance policy issued by an insurer).

3. Record Keeping
As a means of regulating insurance companies and their agents, Florida statutes provide the Office of Insurance Regulation with an absolute right to examine the affairs of every person (insurers and licensees) involved in the business of insurance to see if they are engaged in any unfair trade practices. The law requires agents to maintain records of transactions for 3 years if the transaction pertains to premium payments.

4. Reply to DFS and/or Office of Insurance Regulation
In the course of investigation of the alleged misconduct, the Department or Office may require the licensee to make books and records available for inspection for the purpose of such inquiries. The licensee must reply to the inquiry.

5. Ethics
Market conduct describes the way companies and producers should conduct their business. It is a Code of Ethics for producers. Producers must adhere to certain established procedures, and failure to comply will result in penalties. Some of the market conduct regulations include, but are not limited to, the following:

Conflict of interest;
A request of a gift or loan as a condition to complete business; and
Supplying confidential information.
Producers are required to perform in a professional manner at all times. Professionalism means that a person is engaged in an occupation requiring an advanced level of training, knowledge, or skill. Being professional means placing the public's interest above one's own in all situations. Any deviation could result in a penalty.

Code Of Ethics - Life Underwriters
Florida has incorporated the Code of Ethics into the Insurance Code with respect to trade practices and insurance underwriting (Chapter 69B-215: Agents).

Trade practices: The Business of Life Insurance has been declared to be a public trust in which the services of all agents of all companies have a common obligation to work together in serving the best interest of the insuring public. This is done by understanding and observing the laws governing life insurance by presenting accurately and completely every facet essential to a client's decision, and by being fair in all relations with colleagues and competitors, always placing the policyholder's interest first. The Code of Ethics specifically forbids agents or companies to engage in any act of twisting, rebating, defamation or misrepresentation.

Knowingly committing the offenses known as twisting or churning is a misdemeanor of the first degree, and will result in an administrative fine up to $12,500 for each nonwillful violation or up to $187,500 for each willful violation. To impose an administrative fine for a willful violation, the practice of churning or twisting must involve fraudulent conduct.

NAIFA Code of Ethics
The National Association of Insurance and Financial Advisors (NAIFA) is one of the oldest and largest trade organizations in the insurance field. Its mission is to advocate for a positive regulatory environment and promote professionalism and competence among insurance and financial professionals. One of NAIFA's main goals is to promote the ethical conduct of its members. Insurance agents and financial advisors have professional duties not only to the companies they represent, but also to the client. NAIFA Code of Ethics was designed to address these dual obligations and to help agents strike an ethical balance as they perform their professional duties.

Learn these principles, and live by them in your professional practice:

"I Believe It To Be My Responsibility To

Hold my profession in high esteem and strive to enhance its prestige.
Fulfill the needs of my clients to the best of my ability.
Maintain my clients' confidences.
Render exemplary service to my clients and their beneficiaries.
Adhere to professional standards of conduct in helping my clients to protect insurable obligations and attain their financial security objectives.
Present accurately and honestly all facts essential to my clients' decisions.
Perfect my skills and increase my knowledge through continuing education.
Conduct my business in such a way that my example might help raise the professional standards of those in my profession.
Keep informed with respect to applicable laws and regulations and to observe them in the practice of my profession.
Cooperate with others whose services are constructively related to meeting the needs of my clients."
Privacy of Consumer Information
This regulation was designed to protect the confidentiality of consumers' personal financial records. It assures consumers that their financial records cannot be accessed without their consent and prevents insurers (or other financial entities) from requiring the release of financial records as a condition of doing business. This regulation also states that customers have a right to access a record of all disclosures.

Insurers must provide individuals with an initial notice about the company's privacy policies and practices when the client relationship is established, and on an annual basis thereafter.

G. Florida Insurance Guaranty Association

Florida Insurance Guaranty Association
Guaranty Associations are formed to protect policyowners, insureds, beneficiaries, and anyone entitled to payment under an insurance policy from the incompetence and insolvency of insurers. The association will pay covered claims up to certain limits set by state law. The Association is funded by its members through assessment. All authorized insurers must be members of the Association as a condition of their authority to transact insurance in this state.

Florida Insurance Guaranty Association (FIGA) is a nonprofit entity that was created to provide a mechanism for the payment of covered claims under certain insurance policies to avoid excessive delay in payment and to avoid financial loss to claimants or policyholders because of the insolvency of an insurer.

FIGA's functions apply to all property and casualty insurance, except for ocean marine, title, surplus lines, and workers compensation. For the purposes of administration and assessment, the association is divided into two separate accounts:

The auto liability and auto physical damage account; and
The account for all the other types of property and casualty insurance covered by the association.
The association is obligated to the extent of the covered claims existing:

Prior to insolvency and arising within 30 days after the determination of insolvency;
Before the policy expiration date if less than 30 days after the determination; or
Before the insured replaces or cancels the policy, if within 30 days of the determination.
The association will cover each claim up to $300,000, except for homeowners policies, which may be covered for an additional $200,000 for the portion of a covered claim which relates only to the damage to the structure and contents. The association, however, may not be obligated to a policyholder or claimant in an amount in excess of the obligation of the insolvent insurer under the policy from which the claim arises.

An advertisement or a solicitation that uses the existence of the association for the purpose of sales, solicitation, or inducement to purchase any form of insurance covered under this statute must explain the coverage limits of the association which apply to the type of insurance described in the advertisement or solicitation.

H. Unfair Marketing Practices

Unfair Marketing Practices
Insurers and insurance producers may not engage in any trade practice that is defined as, or determined to be, an unfair method of competition or an unfair or deceptive act or practice in the business of insurance.

It is considered an unfair trade practice to knowingly engage in an unfair method of competition with enough frequency that the commission of unfair marketing practices indicates a general business practice.

If, after a hearing, the Department determines that a producer or an insurer has committed an unfair trade or competition practice, the Department may issue an order requiring the person to cease and desist from engaging in the method of competition, act, or practice, and/or impose penalties for violation of insurance laws.

1. Misrepresentation
It is illegal to issue, publish, or circulate any illustration or sales material that is false, misleading, or deceptive as to policy benefits or terms, or the payment of dividends. This also refers to verbal statements. Committing this illegal act is called misrepresentation.

2. False Advertising
Advertising covers a wide scope of communication, from publishing an ad in a newspaper or magazine, to broadcasting a commercial on television or the Internet. Advertisements cannot include any untrue, deceptive, or misleading statements that apply to the business of insurance or anyone who conducts it. The violation of this rule is called false advertising.

It is prohibited to advertise or circulate any materials that are untrue, deceptive, or misleading. False or deceptive advertising specifically includes misrepresenting any of the following:

Terms, benefits, conditions, or advantages of any insurance policy;
Any dividends to be received from the policy, or previously paid out;
Financial condition of any person or the insurance company; or
The true purpose of an assignment or loan against a policy.
Representing an insurance policy as a share of stock, or using names or titles that may misrepresent the true nature of a policy also will be considered false advertising. In addition, a person or an entity cannot use a name that deceptively suggests it is an insurer.

3. Rebating
Rebating is defined as any inducement offered to the insured in the sale of insurance products that is not specified in the policy. Both the offer and acceptance of a rebate are illegal. Rebates may include, but are not limited to, the following:

Rebates of premiums payable on the policy;
Special favors or services;
Advantages in the dividends or other benefits; and
Stocks, bonds, securities, and their dividends or profits.
According to the Florida statutes on rebating, insurance agents cannot rebate any portion of a commission except as follows:

The rebate is available to all insureds in the same class;
The rebate must be in accordance with a rebating schedule filed by the agent with the insurer issuing the policy;
The rebating schedule must be uniformly applied to all insureds who purchase the same policy through the agent for the same amount of insurance, and receive the same percentage rebate;
The rebate schedule must be prominently displayed in public view in the agent's place of business, with copies available to the insured at no charge;
The age, sex, place of residence, race, nationality, ethnic origin, marital status, or occupation of the insured and the location of the risk cannot be used in determining the percentage of the rebate or whether a rebate is available.
Rebates may only be given as reflected on the rebate schedule, and cannot be unfairly discriminatory. Agents are required to maintain a copy of all rebate schedules for the most recent 5 years.

This regulation does not apply to the insurer's advertising or promotional gifts in which insureds or prospective insureds may be given articles of merchandise, store gift cards, gift certificates, event tickets, anti-fraud or loss mitigation services, or other items not exceeding $100 in value per person in any 12-month period.

4. Coercion
It is illegal to be involved in any activity of coercion which is intended to restrict fair trade or to create a monopoly. Coercion is an unfair trade practice in which an agent uses physical or mental force with the intent of inducing an applicant to purchase insurance.

5. Sliding
Sliding is the illegal practice of falsely leading an applicant to believe that a specified additional coverage or product is required by law (when it is not required), or that it is included in the policy without an additional charge (when a charge is required). Sliding also includes charging an applicant for a specified additional coverage or product, in addition to the cost of the coverage applied for, without the applicant's knowledge or consent.

6. Churning
Churning is defined as replacing insurance policies for the sole purpose of making commissions. The original policy values are used to purchase another insurance with the same insurer for the purpose of earning additional premiums, fees, or commissions. It is illegal to replace existing life or disability policies with new policies if the producer cannot demonstrate that the replacement will benefit the insured.

7. Twisting
Twisting is a misrepresentation, or incomplete or fraudulent comparison of insurance policies that persuades an insured/owner, to their detriment, to cancel, lapse, switch policies, or take out a policy with another insurer. Twisting is prohibited.

8. Defamation
Defamation occurs when an oral or written statement is made that is intended to injure a person engaged in the insurance business. This also applies to statements that are maliciously critical of the financial condition of any person or a company.

9. Unfair Discrimination
Discrimination in rates, premiums, or policy benefits for persons within the same class or with the same life expectancy is illegal. No discrimination may be made on the basis of an individual's marital status, race, national origin, gender identity, sexual orientation, creed, or ancestry unless the distinction is made for a business purpose or required by law.

10. Fraud
Fraud is the intentional misrepresentation or intentional concealment of a material fact used to induce another party to make or refrain from making a contract, or to deceive or cheat a party. Fraud is grounds for voiding an insurance contract.

11. Controlled Business
Controlled business is any coverage written on a producer's own life, health, or property, and/or that of the producer's immediate family or business associates. A licensee is not allowed to collect commissions on controlled business above the state-specified limit. Most states will not issue a license to a person if it is determined that the primary purpose of the license is to write controlled business.

In Florida, licensee's commissions from controlled business cannot exceed 50% of the aggregate amount of commissions and compensation received by the licensee within a 12-month period.

12. Other Unfair Practices and Applicable Penalties
The Florida Insurance Code defines other business practices that may constitute a violation. Insurers or agents who commit these violations will be subject to the following penalties and fines:

VIOLATION

PENALTY

Knowingly making a false or fraudulent application for any license or violating any provision of the Insurance Code	
License denial, suspension, revocation, refusal; and
Fine between $500 and $3,500; and/or
Imprisonment for up to 6 months for each violation
In addition to a fine, CFO may assess an amount equal to the commission the agent earned
Failure to answer a subpoena or order of the CFO	
Contempt of court
$1,000 fine
Aiding and abetting an unauthorized insurer	
Conviction of a third-degree felony
Liability for unpaid claims
Suspension or revocation of all insurance licenses
Transacting insurance without a proper license	
Conviction of a third-degree felony
Liability for unpaid claims
Suspension or revocation of all insurance licenses
Twisting or churning	
First-degree misdemeanor
Administrative fine of up to $12,500 for each nonwillful violation (not to exceed an aggregate amount of $125,000)
Administrative fine of $187,500 for each willful violation (not to exceed an aggregate amount of $625,000)
Forging signatures on an application or policy-related document	
Third-degree felony
Administrative fine up to $187,500 for each willful violation (not to exceed an aggregate amount of $625,000
 Committing fraud against the public	
CFO can turn the matter over to the Attorney General for prosecution
Fraudulent insurance claims and applications	
Third-degree felony

I. By the Numbers - Summary Chart

By the Numbers - Summary Chart
In order to perform your best on the state regulations portion of the exam, make sure you memorize these numbers and their definitions.

Office of Insurance Regulation:
5 years	Examination of authorized insurers
Licensing and Appointment Requirements:
2 years	Agent's appointment is valid
60 days	Notice to the appointee of termination of appointment
30 days	Notice to the Department of termination of agent appointment
Miscellaneous Producer Regulations:
3 years	To maintain records of insurance transactions
24 hours	CE required every 2 years
4 hours	CE hours required in a Law and Ethics update course
30 days	To notify the Department of change of name or address
30 days	To report agent felony or crime convictions to the Department
50%	Maximum commissions from controlled business in a 12-month period

Chapter Recap
This chapter focused on state-specific regulations for insurers and producers. Let's recap some of the important requirements and processes.

INSURANCE

Transacting Insurance

Solicitation or inducement to purchase insurance (presenting)
Preliminary negotiations toward the sale of insurance (take app)
Effectuation of a contract of insurance (issue & deliver policy)
Transaction of matters subsequent to effectuation of a contract of insurance or arising out of it (servicing the client after the sale)
Solicitation

Describing insurance benefits or terms
Distributing an invitation to contract to prospective purchasers
Making general or specific recommendations
Completing orders or applications
Comparing insurance products
Offering or attempting to negotiate a viatical settlement contract on behalf of another person
TYPES OF INSURERS

Domicile

Domestic - home office is incorporated or chartered in the same state where policies are being sold
Foreign - home office is located in a different state than the one where policies are being sold
Alien - home office is chartered in any country other than the United States; considered an alien insurer in ALL U.S. states and territories
Ownership

Stock:
- Owned and controlled by stockholders
- Sell participating and nonparticipating policies
- Stockholders have voting rights (elect Board of Directors)
- Dividends are a share of profits and are taxable
Mutual:
- Owned and controlled by its policyowners
- Sell ONLY participating policies
- Policyowners have voting rights (elect Board of Directors)
- Dividends are a return of premium and are NOT taxable
Admitted/Authorized

Licensed and authorized to transact business in Florida
Obtains a Certificate of Authority from the Office of Insurance Regulation
Nonadmitted/Unauthorized Insurer

Does not come under the jurisdiction of the CFO & Office of Insurance Regulation with regard to examination of its financial soundness, and/or approval of types of coverages offered
Aiding and abetting a nonadmitted insurer:
3rd degree felony
Liability for all unpaid claims
Suspension or revocation of all insurance licenses
DEPARTMENT OF FINANCIAL SERVICES

Administration of Insurance Laws

The Chief Financial Officer (CFO)
The Financial Services Commission
The Commissioner of the Office of Insurance Regulation
Chief Financial Officer (CFO)

Head of the Department of Financial Services
Independently elected
Member of the Governor's cabinet
Member of the Financial Services Commission
Duties:
- Administer regulation of insurance agents and insurers;
- Investigate insurance fraud and unfair trade practices;
- Enforce the Insurance Code and carry out those duties set forth by the Code
"69B" Rules - adopted by the Department; regulate agents
Financial Services Commission	
Responsible for administration and regulation of insurance
2 offices: Office of Financial Regulation and Office of Insurance Regulation
Office of Insurance Regulation (OIR)

Commissioner of the OIR, appointed by the Financial Services Commission
Regulates activities of insurers: licensing, certificates of authority, rates, policy forms, claims, solvency
"69O" Rules - adopted by the OIR; regulate insurers
Office of Financial Regulation (OFR)

Commissioner of Financial Regulations
Regulates activities of banks, finance companies, and securities industry
LICENSE AND APPOINTMENTS

Licensing Process

Florida law requires any individual who solicits insurance to hold a valid license issued by the Department of Financial Services
Minimum age requirement (18 years old)
Pass examination
- The license exam may not be taken by an applicant more than 5 times in a 12-month period
Submit application and fees
Be of good character
Have not committed any violations that are grounds for license denial
Types of Licenses

Individuals - resident and nonresident
Temporary license - valid for 6 months; issued to maintain the existing business
Agency - a business location at which an individual, firm, partnership corporation, association or other entity engages in any activity that by law can only be performed by a licensed insurance agent; does not include an insurer or adjuster
- A licensed agent must be designated to be in full-time charge of each licensed agency location and is deemed the Agent in Charge
Unaffiliated agent - a licensed agent not appointed by any insurer, but is self-appointed; acts as an independent consultant for a fee that must be established through a written contract with the parties involved
Maintenance and Duration

License is perpetual and remains in effect unless revoked or suspended as long as fees are paid and continuing education requirements are met
Continuing education - must be completed every reporting period:
- 24 hours of CE every 2 years, including a 4-hour Law and Ethics update course
- Excess hours can be carried over to the next compliance period
- A nonresident agent may use the hours earned in home state to meet the Florida CE requirement if the home state has reciprocity with Florida
- If multiple licenses are held, the agent must complete an update course in at least one of the lines held
Report changes of name or address (including residence, business, email) within 30 days
Report administrative action taken by any government or other regulatory agency that relates to insurance, securities, or activities involving fraud, dishonesty, untrustworthiness, or breach of fiduciary duty within 30 days
Report any instances of being found guilty, or pleading guilty, or nolo contendere ("no contest") to a felony or a crime punishable by imprisonment of 1 year or more in any jurisdiction within 30 days
License is not required if a person does not receive commissions
Disciplinary actions:
Suspension, revocation or refusal to renew a license
Cease and desist order
Monetary fines
Imprisonment
License Transfer	
A license in good standing can be transferred from another state as long as it is in the same line of authority and has been active for at least one year prior to relocation
 The agent must become a resident of Florida and submit an application and the appropriate fees within 90 days
Appointments	
Licensee must be properly appointed by an insurer to transact insurance
48 months (4 years) to have an agent license appointed; otherwise, license terminates
Appointment remains in effect until revoked, suspended, or terminated, but must be renewed every 2 years
Insurer is responsible for renewals and paying the fee
- Late renewal requests must be accompanied by a late filing fee paid by the insurer, not the licensee 
Appointments are not transferable
Suspension, Termination, Revocation of License	
Unlawful rebating
Twisting
Misrepresentation of a policy, agent or insurer
Excessive Controlled Business
Fraud
Violating any ruling of the CFO
Violating any provision of Florida Insurance Law
Incompetence or untrustworthiness
Violating the Code of Ethics
Sale of an unregistered security
Representing an unauthorized insurer
Sliding
Felony conviction
AGENT REGULATIONS

Commissions and Fees

Agents are compensated by a commission which is a percentage of the initial (first year) and subsequent premiums
Commissions may only be shared with another Licensed and Appointed Agent
Controlled Business	
Selling insurance on an agent's own life or property, or on that of the agent's family members or business associates
Illegal if commissions from controlled business exceed 50% of all commissions
UNFAIR TRADE PRACTICES

Misrepresentation

Untrue, deceptive or misleading information in regard to the terms of an insurance contract, insurance company, insurance agent including the financial standing of any insurer
Omission of a material fact
- Innocent misrepresentation of a material fact is grounds to void a contract; misrepresentations of immaterial facts may also make contract voidable
False Advertising	
Circulating any material that is untrue, deceptive, or misleading
Misrepresenting policy terms, benefits, dividends, or advantages
Representing an insurance policy as a share of stock
Using names or titles that may misrepresent the true nature of a policy
Rebating	
Kickbacks - giving anything of value in exchange for purchasing a policy
Florida allows rebating under STRICT guidelines
Most insurers do not allow rebating
Coercion	
Imposing one's will on another; falsely stating that a client must buy one product in order to qualify for another
A prime example of coercion is a loan officer who claims that a client must buy mortgage life insurance in order to qualify for the loan
Sliding	
Representing to an applicant that a specific ancillary coverage or product is either:
- Required by law when it is not; or
- Included in the policy at no charge when there is a charge
Churning	
Replacing policies within the same company, often by the same producer in order to generate commissions
Using policy values in an existing policy to purchase another policy or contract with the same insurer
Twisting	
Illegally inducing any person to lapse, forfeit, surrender, convert an existing policy to replace it with another insurer's policy
Defamation	
Making false statements in writing (libel) or verbally (slander) with the intent of injuring any person engaged in the business of life insurance
Unfair Discrimination	
Knowingly making or permitting any unfair discrimination between individuals with regards to the business of insurance
Unfair Claims Settlement	
Any form of misrepresentation of pertinent facts
Agent and insurer must acknowledge claim promptly
Insurer must process the claim in a timely manner
Insurer cannot delay the benefit payment
Insure must provide a reasonable explanation in writing if there is a reason for denial
Fraud	
Intentional deception (lie) that results in injury, for financial gain
Code of Ethics	
Incorporated into Florida State Laws under Rule 69B-215
NAIFA has its own Code of Ethics
Standards of agents' behavior in dealing with the public (including allowable and prohibited practices)
Business of insurance is a public trust in which all agents have a common obligation to work together in serving the best interests of the insuring public
Violation of Ethics Laws can result in license suspension or revocation
Willful offenses of twisting or churning subject to a fine up to $75,000 per violation


Department of Insurance – General Powers and Duties

00:00
We're going to discuss rules and regulations that apply to all lines of authority and all insurance companies and producers, in particular, common laws that are relatively uniform across all of the states.

00:13
Insurance is regulated at the state level by the state department or division of insurance or department of financial services in some states.

00:21
What is the purpose of that entity in each state?

00:25
In broad terms, the department controls and supervises all insurance business that's conducted in your state.

00:32
However, they are 100% focused on consumer protection.

00:37
Insurance laws and regulations are enacted to protect the insurance buying public, and the role of the Department of Insurance is to enforce those laws.

00:48
The department is responsible for issuing licenses to producers, the license that you're studying for, as well as issuing certificates of authority to insurance companies.

00:58
An insurance company cannot just start doing business in a state.

01:02
First, they must submit an application, provide rate charts and underwriting guidelines, and make financial disclosures, all to be reviewed and approved by the Department of Insurance.

01:15
Once the department is satisfied that the insurance company is properly qualified, they issue a certificate of authority to the insurer.

01:24
This means the insurance company has been admitted or authorized and can now transact insurance business in the state.

01:31
The insurance department is also responsible for approving policy forms.

01:37
All policy forms and pertinent premium rates that are used by insurers must be filed with and approved by the department.

01:46
The department has the power to conduct examinations, investigations, and hearings.

01:51
In fact, they're required by law to conduct an examination or audit of every domestic insurance company, usually once every three to five years depending on the state requirement.

02:03
Make sure you know the exact time limit for your state for your exam.

02:09
The examination is intended to verify that the insurer is treating consumers fairly and is in a solid financial position to meet its claim paying obligations to customers.

02:21
And remember this, when the insurance department conducts this examination, the company being examined is responsible for covering the expenses.

02:31
If an insurance company gets in trouble financially or is not following the state laws or is treating consumers unfairly, the Department of Insurance may take administrative action such as imposing fines and penalties.

02:47
In the most serious cases, they can revoke the insurer's certificate of authority, which means the company cannot transact insurance business in the state anymore.

02:59
The same applies to individual producers.

03:01
The department may impose an administrative penalty or revoke a producer's license for violations of insurance laws.

03:10
One more important note, there is an individual in charge of the Department of Insurance in each state.

03:17
This official may be called the commissioner, director, or superintendent, and is either appointed by the state governor or elected by the state voters.

03:28
This official has the same powers and duties as the ones we've just outlined for the Department of Insurance.

03:35
In other words, their role is to enforce the insurance laws within the state.

03:42
Make sure you carefully review the state laws and regulations in your study materials to become familiar with the powers and duties of your state department of insurance.

Types of Licenses

00:00
There are different types of licenses you need to know for your exam.

00:04
Let's start by talking about the ones that you're working toward.

00:07
An insurance producer license.

00:10
This license gives you the authority to sell, solicit, or negotiate insurance.

00:16
The classification of producer usually includes agents and brokers.

00:22
An agent is someone who acts on behalf of an insurance company and legally represents that insurance company, not the client.

00:32
A broker is an insurance producer who is not appointed by an insurer and who usually represents the client.

00:40
Make sure you understand the distinction.

00:43
When you're selling on behalf of an insurance company or multiple companies, you also have to be appointed by each insurer whose products you're selling.

00:53
It is the insurer who pays a fee and sends a notification to the insurance department to register that appointment or its termination.

01:03
Another type of license that you could obtain is a nonresident license in another state.

01:09
If you wanna sell insurance products to a customer in another state, you would need to get a nonresident license in that state.

01:17
For example, you might live close to a state border, and there could be a lot of crossover business between the two states.

01:24
You always begin by getting a resident insurance license in the state that you live or work, known as your resident or home state.

01:34
Once you have a valid resident license, you can easily obtain a non resident license by submitting an application to that Department of Insurance and paying a fee.

01:44
You don't have to take another licensing exam.

01:47
Most states are completely reciprocal, meaning a nonresident producer has the same rights and privileges as resident producers as long as they hold the same license and sell the same products in their home state.

02:03
Then there is a business entity license.

02:07
A business entity license may be required when a corporation, partnership, sole proprietorship, or limited liability company will be transacting insurance business, for example, an insurance agency or a branch office, at least one person must be identified as the designated licensed producer who is responsible for the business entity's compliance with state insurance laws and regulations.

02:35
Finally, the temporary license was created for use in very specific circumstances.

02:41
It is usually issued to the surviving spouse of an agent who dies or becomes disabled, to a member or employee of a business entity upon death or disability of the designated insurance agent, or to a designated person if a licensed agent is entering active military service.

03:02
Let's say an insurance agent has outstanding commissions, meaning the policy has been sold and issued, but the agent is still waiting for the commission check.

03:11
What happens if the agent passes away during that time?

03:15
By law, no one can receive commissions from the sale of an insurance product without being licensed.

03:21
So the surviving spouse can apply to the Department of Insurance for a temporary license, which would allow the outstanding commissions to be paid to the spouse.

03:32
The thing to remember about temporary licenses is they are used only to service existing business, not write any new business.

03:41
They are issued for a short period of time, which varies by state, but is usually no more than one hundred and eighty days, and they typically cannot be renewed.

Producer Licensing and Appointment

00:00
There are certain basic requirements that apply to anyone who wants to become licensed as an insurance producer.

00:07
First, you have to be at least 18 years of age or legally considered an adult.

00:14
That's because insurance policies are legal contracts.

00:18
And as the company's agent, you will be responsible for signing the contract, so you can't have a contract with a minor.

00:26
In most states, you are required to complete your pre licensing education, and all candidates for a producer license must pass a state licensing exam.

00:36
No doubt, you're gonna do that on the very first try.

00:40
Then you must complete the application process and pay the required fees within a specified time after passing your exam.

00:49
Make sure to check your state requirements for that.

00:52
You are expected to be competent, trustworthy, and of good moral character.

00:58
You will be handling your customers and insurance companies money and making recommendations about important financial decisions.

01:06
To ensure that your customers will not be misled or otherwise taken advantage of, you are expected to have good morals and high ethical standards.

01:15
You can't have any felony convictions or a criminal history.

01:19
If you do, you must disclose those to the Department of Insurance and may be able to apply for a waiver.

01:26
Most states also require fingerprinting or, at the very least, a background check.

01:32
Once you get licensed and are planning to work for an insurance company, you must be appointed by the company to transact any business for them.

01:41
Sometimes, the insurer appoints their agents before they even sell their first policy, and other times, they make the appointment in conjunction with the first insurance application an agent submits.

01:54
An agent may hold more than one appointment with more than one insurance company, but must have a separate appointment for each insurer they represent.

02:06
As long as you're selling products on behalf of that insurer, the appointment must be kept active.

02:12
The insurance company notifies the Department of Insurance of all its appointments, new, renewed, or terminated, and pays the required appointment fees.

02:24
An insurance producer who does not act as an agent of an insurer does not need to become appointed.

Maintaining a License

00:00
Once you obtain your producer license, it remains in effect unless revoked or suspended and may be continually renewed as long as you meet all of your state requirements for maintaining your license.

00:13
Producers usually must renew their licenses every two years, but there might be differences by state, so be sure to check the rules for your state.

00:24
To renew your license and keep it in good standing, you must do the following, Complete continuing education required every licensing period.

00:34
Pay a renewal fee.

00:36
Maintain a current record of your name and address with the Department of Insurance.

00:41
And if for some reason your license lapses, reinstate it within a specified period of time.

00:49
Let's look at those requirements in greater detail.

00:53
Continuing education or CE requirements vary by state, but many states have standardized the requirement to include three hours of ethics as part of their CE requirement.

01:07
Don't forget to check the rules for your state and know the specific number of hours you must complete every licensing period.

01:15
It is not only important for your exam, but also to help you keep your license active once you become licensed.

01:22
A word of advice, do not wait until the last minute to complete your continuing education.

01:28
Once you get your license, take every opportunity to start completing some CE courses.

01:35
CE requirements sometimes must be completed a month or two before a license actually expires, So you wanna make sure you know exactly what is required because it's your responsibility as a licensed producer to stay on top of that.

01:53
If you accidentally let your license expire, your state may allow for reinstatement within a certain period of time, usually twelve months.

02:02
In this case, you will only be required to complete your continuing education and pay a late renewal fee to reinstate the license.

02:12
If you wait beyond the reinstatement period, you will have to start over and repeat the licensing process, including passing the licensing exam.

02:22
You are also responsible for notifying the Department of Insurance of any changes in your name or address, and that applies to your residential, business, or email address.

02:34
You usually have thirty days to notify them of any changes.

02:38
Make sure you keep all of your contact information current with the state department of insurance at all times.

02:46
You are also responsible for reporting to the department any administrative action against you, even if it's taken in another jurisdiction or by another governmental agency.

02:57
Let's say you had a nonresident license in another state, and the state determined that you violated an insurance law and revoked your license.

03:07
Reporting of actions means you have to report that action to the Department of Insurance in your resident state within thirty days.

03:16
Any administrative actions against you and any final judgments against you in a court proceeding must be reported to the state department of insurance in your resident state.

03:28
One more key point on maintaining an active license, there is a very easy rule about commissions and insurance sales.

03:37
You cannot sell insurance unless you are properly licensed, and you cannot be paid a commission unless you are properly licensed.

03:46
It is acceptable to share commissions as long as both producers are properly licensed at the time of the transaction.

03:55
It's as easy as that.

Unfair Trade Practices

00:00
There are certain activities and behaviors that can get producers and insurers in trouble with the Department of Insurance, from suspension and revocation of licenses to fines and even imprisonment.

00:13
Let's take a look at some of the most common examples of what would be considered unfair trade practices and that are therefore illegal.

00:21
The first one is misrepresentation.

00:24
Misrepresentation occurs when a producer makes false, misleading, or deceptive statements about policies, their terms, or benefits in order to persuade a customer to buy a product.

00:37
You cannot lie about the features of an insurance product or make it sound better than it is just to make a sale.

00:44
Whether done in writing or verbally, a misrepresentation is a violation of insurance laws.

00:51
False advertising applies more to your insurance company because as a producer, you won't be creating your own advertisements.

01:00
You will be using approved advertising provided by your agency or the company that you represent.

01:07
Advertisements cannot include any untrue, deceptive, or misleading statements that apply to the business of insurance or anyone who conducts it.

01:17
You may be familiar with the concept of rebating as it applies to the world of retail, but it's not a good thing when it comes to selling insurance.

01:27
Rebating is defined as offering benefits or services that are not specifically spelled out in an insurance agreement or policy as an inducement to the transaction.

01:38
An example would be a customer agreeing to buy a policy from you if you agree to share a portion of your commission.

01:47
Another example would be you offering something of value outside of the policy to a customer, like tickets to the World Series, as an inducement to purchasing a policy from you.

01:58
Keep in mind that both the offer and acceptance of rebating are illegal.

02:05
Some states allow insurers and producers to give advertising or promotional gifts or prizes to potential insureds as long as they don't exceed a specified dollar amount, which is usually pretty small.

02:19
Check your state requirement for that.

02:22
Twisting is next, another term that has a unique meaning when applied to insurance transactions.

02:28
Twisting happens when you make misleading comparisons between your product and, say, a product the client already owns from a different insurer.

02:37
So you're trying to twist them out of their existing policy by making misleading, untrue, or incomplete statements about the policy you're trying to sell to generate a commission.

02:50
You might exaggerate the benefits or gloss over the disadvantages of canceling their current coverage.

02:59
Defamation means making malicious or critical statements about a person or a company, and especially about another agent or insurer, to make your own company and products seem superior.

03:12
Know your product and know your competitors' products so you can fairly compare them, and you will be doing the right thing.

03:21
While insurers use underwriting as a risk classification and selection process, they cannot discriminate unfairly against applicants.

03:30
Discrimination in rates, premiums charged, or benefits offered to any person based on race, ethnicity, religion, marital status, gender, or disability is illegal.

03:43
Insurance premiums must be based on level of risk as determined by actuarial statistics that are fair and not discriminatory.

03:53
Beware of all of these practices and avoid them in your interactions with customers.

Fraud and False Statements

00:00
Fraud is defined as an intentional misrepresentation of a material fact. The word "material" means important.

00:08
If someone intentionally misrepresents a material fact on an insurance application — basically lies, the company underwriters would not be able to accurately evaluate the level of risk that the applicant represents to the insurance company, and the policy may be issued based on false information.

00:26
Fraud is an intentional act to deceive or cheat. Fraud is grounds for voiding an insurance contract.

00:35
False statements would be defined as knowingly making untrue verbal or written statements pertaining to any aspect of insurance or insurers, including false statements on the insurance application, policy renewal, notice of claim, proof of loss, or any statement regarding the insurer's financial condition.

00:56
If false statements or fraud affect activities of interstate commerce, which involves transacting insurance or providing services across state borders, the penalties may be very severe: thousands of dollars and fines and imprisonment of up to 10 to 15 years.

Violations and Penalties

00:00
What is the process if a producer or insurer appears to have violated a state's unfair trade practices laws?

00:08
Remember, the main role of the Department of Insurance is to enforce insurance laws and to protect the public from unfair trade practices.

00:18
If the department suspects or has reason to believe that an insurer or producer has committed a violation or is engaged in an unfair trade practice, they will conduct an investigation, issue a statement of charges, and hold a hearing for any purpose deemed necessary within the scope of the insurance code.

00:40
A hearing may be held upon a written request by an aggrieved person.

00:44
A hearing is a good practice because it gives the person being charged a chance to hear the charges formally and construct a defense.

00:53
The department must provide advance notice of the time and place of the hearing.

00:58
Hearings must be held promptly.

01:01
Make sure to memorize your state's specific time frames for when the notice must be given and when the hearing must be held.

01:10
At the hearing, if the charges are found to be justified, the insurance department may impose penalties and fines and can suspend, revoke, or non renewal license or a certificate of authority depending on the severity of the violation.

01:26
If the department believes a violation is serious and poses a threat to the insurance buying public, they may issue a cease and desist order telling a person to stop committing a particular violation.

01:40
A cease and desist order is intended to protect the insurance buying public from immediate harm.

01:47
Anyone who receives a cease and desist order must be informed of the charges and, again, may request a hearing.

01:55
Violating an order after it's become final is a serious offense and may result in significant fines in addition to suspension or revocation of a license or a certificate of authority.

02:08
If a producer's license is suspended, the suspension is usually temporary, no more than a year.

02:15
Revocation, however, typically means it's permanent.

02:19
Some states allow a producer whose license has been revoked to apply for a new license after a specified number of years.

02:27
If a producer's license is suspended or revoked, that will need to be disclosed on any future application for a license.

02:35
Be sure to review your state specific rules pertaining to disciplinary actions and unfair trade practices.

02:43
Also, when you're studying state laws and regulations, you will need to know what fines, administrative actions, or other penalties may be applied to different types of violations.

02:55
These will often show up on your exam because it is important for producers to understand what the potential consequences may be for violating the state's insurance laws and regulations.

Insurance Guaranty Association

00:00
All insurance companies transacting business in a state are required to be members of that state's insurance guarantee association or the insurance guarantee fund in some states as a condition for maintaining their certificate of authority.

00:16
Things you need to know about this association.

00:19
Guarantee associations are nonprofit legal entities.

00:24
What is their purpose?

00:25
The purpose of the association is to protect policy owners, insureds, and their beneficiaries in case an insurer becomes insolvent and is unable to pay claims.

00:38
Every year, insurers must file a financial report with the Department of Insurance.

00:43
If the insurer's reserves are less than the minimum required by law, the company is considered impaired in its ability to pay claims and is technically insolvent.

00:55
The insurance have paid their premiums with the expectation of having their claims paid, but the company is now unable to meet its obligation to its customers.

01:04
This is where the guarantee association will step in and cover the insured's unpaid claims.

01:11
Where does the money come from for those claims to be paid on behalf of an insolvent insurance company?

01:17
Remember that all insurance companies who are approved to transact insurance business in the state are required to be members of the association.

01:26
Those members are assessed an annual fee, a certain dollar amount based on the volume of their annual business written in the state to fund the association.

01:36
The association will pay claims only up to specified limits.

01:41
If the insurer on the original policy has been declared insolvent, the policy will be subject to the lower of either the amount of the claim or the payout limit, and the claimant may not receive the full benefit.

01:57
These payout limits enable the guarantee association to ensure that sufficient funds are available for all claimants.

02:05
Another important point about the guarantee association is that insurance producers are prohibited from making any statement about the existence of the guarantee association or its protections in their sales presentations.

02:20
Producers may not in any way imply to customers that insurance benefits are guaranteed because they are backed up by a state guarantee association.

02:30
That is considered a violation of the rules governing unfair trade practices.

Flash cards: 

Two individuals who are in the same risk and age class are charged different rates for their insurance policies due to an insignificant factor. What is this called?
Answer
Discrimination
If an insurer meets the state's financial requirements and is approved to transact business in the state, it is considered what type of insurer?
Answer
Authorized or admitted
What is controlled business?
Answer
Insurance on the producer's own life or property, or the lives or property of the producer's family or business associates
Who is an insurance agent?
Answer
A person authorized to sell, solicit and negotiate insurance contracts
Who may share in the commission from the sale of an insurance policy?
Answer
Only producers properly licensed for the type of insurance transaction
What illegal act does a producer commit when the producer represents a policy in a more favorable light than the policy really is?
Answer
Misrepresentation
What are producers required to do in order to renew their license?
Answer
Complete continuing education hours and pay a renewal fee
What type of insurer is formed under the laws of another state?
Answer
Foreign
Who owns stock companies?
Answer
Stockholders
When would a misrepresentation on an insurance application be considered fraud?
Answer
When it is intentional and material
A state-issued document empowering an insurance company to become an admitted insurer is called what?
Answer
Certificate of Authority
What is the purpose of a cease and desist order?
Answer
To prevent a producer or insurer from further violating laws for transacting insurance
An agent offers a client free tickets to a sporting event in exchange for the purchase of an insurance policy. What is the agent guilty of?
Answer
Rebating
Who must be notified of a producer's change of address?
Answer
The Department of Insurance (Commissioner/Director/Superintendent)
If the Commissioner/Superintendent finds a licensee engaging in an unfair method of competition or an unfair practice, what order will be issued?
Answer
Cease and desist order
Who is considered a nonresident agent?
Answer
An agent who resides and is licensed in another state, but who is authorized to transact insurance in this state
If a producer makes maliciously critical statements about another insurer, what is this illegal practice called?
Answer
Defamation
On its advertisement, a company claims that it has funds in its possession that are, in fact, not available for the payment of losses or claims. What is the company guilty of?
Answer
Misrepresentation
Which type of misrepresentation persuades an insured, to their detriment, to cancel, lapse, or switch policies from one to another?
Answer
Twisting
What type of licensee represents the insurance company?
Answer
The agent
When can the Commissioner or Director examine insurers?
Answer
Whenever deemed necessary, but at least once every few years (please check your state regulations for specific time requirement)
If an insurer holds a Certificate of Authority, it is known as what type of insurer?
Answer
Authorized or admitted
In general, who can be excluded from producer licensing and examination requirements?
Answer
Insurance company officers, directors, or any other employees who do not transact insurance and who do not receive commissions for their services (usually, their responsibilities include administrative, executive or clerical)
To whom may a certificate of authority be issued?
Answer
To an insurer authorized to transact business in this state
Who is responsible for the costs associated with the examination of insurers?
Answer
The insurer who is being examined
The requirement that agents must account for and promptly remit all insurance funds collected is known as what type of agent responsibility?
Answer
Fiduciary
When is controlled business legal?
Answer
When the commissions from controlled business do not exceed the aggregate commissions on all the other business (specific limits may vary from state to state)
What document is required for an insurance company to transact insurance?
Answer
Certificate of Authority
Insurers are classified according to their domicile. What are the three types of insurers?
Answer
Domestic, foreign, and alien
What are the most common penalties for violations of insurance statutes?
Answer
A cease and desist order, a fine, and license suspension or revocation
